Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB227.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act:
(1) "Account holder" means a natural person who is a resident of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky who has an account or a profile with a unique
identifier on a covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform
during any period in which a covered social media platform knows or should
reasonably know the person is physically located in Kentucky;
(2) "Addictive feature" includes:
(a) Infinite scrolling, including:
1. Continuously loading content, or content that loads as the account
holder scrolls down the page without the need to open a separate page;
or
2. Seamless content, or the use of pages with no visible or apparent end
or page breaks;
(b) Display of a profile-exploiting feed;
(c) Push notifications, whether audible, visual, or tactile:
1. Designed to:
a. Call the attention of the account holder to newly posted content
or to user responses to content posted by the account holder; or
b. Inform the account holder about other specific activities or
events related to the account holder’s account; and
2. Not including notifications for the purposes of alerting the account
holder to incoming calls, text messages, email messages, or similar
messages sent by human contacts and delivered by means of any
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
application;
(d) Autoplay video or video that begins to play without the account holder first
clicking on the video or on a play button for that video;
(e) Display of personal metrics that indicate the number of times other users
have clicked a button or taken other action to indicate their reaction to
content posted by the account holder or have shared or reposted content
posted by the account holder; and
(f) Display of awards, badges, tiers, or any form of recognition of the account
holder based on hours spent by the account holder on the social media
platform, numbers of followers, numbers of postings, frequency or
regularity of postings, or any other metric of usage or performance on the
social media platform;
(3) "AI companion chatbot" means a generative artificial intelligence system or
application that simulates interpersonal interactions with a user, including but
not limited to:
(a) Using anthropomorphic features such as exhibiting a distinct personality,
voice, character, or persona, including but not limited to acting as a friend,
companion, romantic or sexual partner, mentor, celebrity, fictional
character, advisor, or spiritual being;
(b) Personalizing interactions or facilitating ongoing user engagement with the
AI companion chatbot, including by utilizing emotional recognition
algorithms or information from user interactions, preferences, or data;
(c) Providing unprompted or unsolicited questions, topics, ideas, or advice that
go beyond a factual response to a user prompt; and
(d) Engaging in an interaction concerning matters personal to the user;
(4) "AI companion platform" means any online service that simulates interpersonal
interactions with a user, including but not limited to offering emotional support,
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
entertainment, roleplay, and enterprise tools;
(5) "Child" means an individual under the age of thirteen (13) as defined in 15
U.S.C. sec. 6501(1);
(6) "Covered AI companion platform" means an AI companion platform, including
any parent company, subsidiary, or affiliate of that AI companion platform, that
collectively has more than ten million (10,000,000) registered users worldwide
and owns or operates a website, mobile application, or digital service providing
AI companion chatbot services to users;
(7) "Covered social media platform" means a social media platform, including any
parent company, subsidiary, or affiliate of the social media platform that
collectively generated at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in gross
revenues annually, worldwide, in one (1) or more of the preceding three (3)
years;
(8) "Emotional recognition algorithms" means artificial intelligence that detects and
interprets human emotional signals in text, video, audio, or a combination of
media;
(9) "First trigger date" means, with respect to each account holder and each covered
AI companion platform or covered social media platform, the date upon which
the account holder has been on the covered AI companion platform or covered
social media platform for twenty-five (25) hours or more within a six (6) month
period following the effective date of this Act;
(10) "Minor" means an individual under the age of eighteen (18);
(11) "Notice to a parent" has the same meaning as established in the Children’s
Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501 et seq., and 16 C.F.R. sec.
312.4;
(12) "Paid commercial advertising" is advertising:
(a) For which the social media platform receives any compensation in return
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
for displaying the advertising; and
(b) That seeks to encourage the account holder to:
1. Purchase a product or service or otherwise engage in a commercial
transaction; or
2. Follow a link to a website that encourages the account holder to
engage in a commercial transaction;
(13) "Parent" includes any legal guardian of a minor resident of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky;
(14) "Personal information" means:
(a) Information about an account holder collected online that comprises
personal information as defined in the Children’s Online Privacy Protection
Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501(8);
(b) Any record of or information derived from online activity or history, search
history, or online communications of an account holder with respect to any
application, website, or social media platform;
(c) Any photograph or biometric information that is used or could reasonably
be used to identify the account holder, including but not limited to
fingerprints, voiceprints, iris or retina imagery scans, facial templates, and
gait imagery or metric; or
(d) Any geolocation information associated with an account holder or with a
device of an account holder;
(15) "Profile-based paid commercial advertising" means paid commercial advertising
that has been selected or prioritized for display to an account holder based in
whole or in part on the personal information of the account holder;
(16) "Profile-exploiting feed" means an addictive feature or the practice of using
social media algorithms that leverage personal data for engagement and potential
harm to a user;
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
(17) "Second trigger date" means, with respect to each account holder and each
covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform, the date upon
which the account holder has been on the covered AI companion platform or
covered social media platform for fifty (50) hours or more within a six (6) month
period following the effective date of this Act;
(18) "Social media platform" means any online service that:
(a) Displays content that is primarily generated by account holders; and
(b) Permits an individual to register as an account holder and create a profile
that is made visible to the general public or a set of other users defined by
the account holder; and
(19) "Verifiable parental consent" means authorization that:
(a) Is provided by an individual who the covered AI companion platform or
covered social media platform has verified is at least eighteen (18) years old;
(b) Is given after the covered AI companion platform or covered social media
platform has clearly and conspicuously provided the parental consent
disclosure to the individual; and
(c) Requires the parent to make a choice to grant or decline consent.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Within fourteen (14) days of the first trigger date, the covered AI
companion platform or covered social media platform shall use reasonable
means and efforts, taking into consideration available technology and the
data in the possession of the covered AI companion platform or covered
social media platform, to estimate the age of the account holder.
(b) If the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform is
able to conclude with eighty percent (80%) confidence that the account
holder is over sixteen (16) years of age, the covered AI companion platform
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
or covered social media platform shall treat the account holder as an
individual other than a child. Otherwise, the covered AI companion
platform or covered social media platform shall treat the account holder as
a child for purposes of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
(2) (a) Within fourteen (14) days of the second trigger date, the covered AI
companion platform or covered social media platform shall use reasonable
means and efforts to revise its estimate of the account holder's age.
(b) If the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform is
able to conclude with ninety percent (90%) confidence that the account
holder is over sixteen (16) years of age, the covered AI companion platform
may treat the account holder as an individual other than a child. Otherwise,
the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall
treat the account holder as a child for purposes of Sections 1 to 8 of this
Act.
(3) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall update
its estimate of the age of each account holder after every additional one hundred
(100) hours spent by the account holder on the platform, or as often as the
covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform applies any
form of data analytics or artificial intelligence to update its estimate of any other
demographic characteristic of the account holder for any reason, whichever
period is shorter.
(4) This section shall not be construed to create any duty on the part of a covered AI
companion platform or covered social media platform to request, collect, or retain
any information from or about any account holder. The age estimate required by
this section shall be derived based on information collected and retained in the
ordinary course of operation of the covered social media platform or covered
social media platform.
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
(5) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall not
have any obligation under Sections 1 to 8 of this Act to estimate the age of an
account holder or take any action with respect to any account if the account
holder had the account with the covered social media platform continuously for
at least seven (7) years prior to the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall require
any applicant for an account to provide his or her birth date as part of the
account application process.
(2) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall not
create or maintain an account for a child, or change the terms and conditions of
an account for a child, without first obtaining verifiable parental consent.
Information collected for the purpose of obtaining verifiable parental consent
shall not be used for any purpose other than obtaining verifiable parental consent
and shall be deleted immediately after an attempt to obtain verifiable parental
consent, except to the extent necessary to comply with any other applicable state
or federal law or regulation.
(3) An account for a child shall have all privacy settings set by default at the most
private level. A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform
shall not change the privacy settings of an account of a child without first
obtaining verifiable parental consent for the change until the account holder is
no longer a child.
(4) In the course of obtaining verifiable parental consent for the establishment or
continuation of an account for a child, a covered AI companion platform or a
covered social media platform shall prominently provide and explain an option
for a parent to make his or her consent conditional on receipt by the parent of a
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
separate password that enables the parent to:
(a) Monitor the amount of time the child spends using the covered AI
companion platform or covered social media platform;
(b) Set daily and weekly time limits on use of the covered AI companion
platform or covered social media platform; and
(c) Set limits on the time of day when the covered AI companion platform or
covered social media platform can be accessed by the child.
(5) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall not
present addictive features in the display or feed of any child.
(6) A covered AI companion platform or covered social medial platform shall not
present profile-based paid commercial advertising in the display or feed of any
child.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall
terminate an account if it concludes, or obtains information from which it should
reasonably conclude pursuant to its obligations under Section 2 of this Act, that
the account holder is a child, unless verifiable parental consent has been
obtained for the account.
(2) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall
terminate an account of a minor within seven (7) days after a request for
termination from the account holder.
(3) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall
terminate the account of a minor within fourteen (14) days after receipt of a
request for termination from a parent of the minor. Upon receipt of a request for
termination, the covered AI companion platform or covered social media
platform shall verify that the requesting party is a parent of the account holder by
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
the verification means used by the covered AI companion platform or covered
social media platform for ascertaining the validity of the verifiable parental
consent.
(4) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall provide
clear, simple, and efficient means for the parent of any minor to request
termination of any account of a minor.
(5) If a covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform makes a
determination that it must terminate an account because the account holder has
been classified as a child and verifiable parental consent has not been obtained,
the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall notify
the account holder of its intent to terminate the account within seven (7) days of
making the determination and shall provide the reason for the termination. The
account holder shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the notice to dispute
the age classification and complete an age verification process, or to provide
verifiable parental consent to the covered AI companion platform or covered
social media platform.
(6) If an account holder disputes his or her classification as a child, a covered AI
companion platform or covered social media platform may rely on any
commercially reasonable age verification process to resolve the dispute. A
covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall make a
reasonable determination within thirty (30) days of the completion of the age
verification process. If a covered AI companion platform or covered social media
platform concludes it is obligated to terminate an account, it shall terminate that
account within seven (7) days of that determination.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall not be construed to limit in any way beyond any limits
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
imposed by other law the:
(1) Content parents may show their children; or
(2) Results an online search engine may return in response to a query by a child.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform permits a
child to open an account or continue to be an account holder without parental
consent sufficient for the formation of a binding contract with a minor under
ordinary principles of contract law under the laws of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, any contract pertaining to the account is invalid and unenforceable as
contrary to public policy, including but not limited to any arbitration provision,
limitation of liability, or limitation of remedies, without regard to whether the
covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform had actual or
constructive knowledge that the account holder was a child.
(2) A child or parent shall have a private right of action for declaratory or injunctive
relief, damages, including harm to mental health and emotional distress, court
costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and any other appropriate relief as a result of
any negligent, reckless, or intentional violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
(3) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform that
recklessly or intentionally violates any provision of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act
shall be assessed a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or of actual
damages established at trial, whichever is greater.
(4) A covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform shall not be
liable for any violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act if it has used reasonable
means and efforts, including but not limited to using available technology and
any data in possession of the covered AI companion platform or covered social
media platform, to comply with the requirements of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
(5) (a) A civil action for damages for a violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall
be brought within three (3) years of the date the plaintiff knew or
reasonably should have known of the alleged violation.
(b) The limitation period for this action shall be tolled during the minority of
the plaintiff pursuant to KRS 413. 170.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any waiver or limitation of any prohibition, limitation, requirement, or right to
remedies established by Sections 1 to 8 of this Act is unlawful, contrary to public
policy, void ab initio, and of no effect, and a court or arbitrator shall not enforce
or give effect to any waiver, notwithstanding any choice of law provision in a
contract.
(2) If any provision of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provision other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
Sections 1 to 8 of this Act are severable.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall be considered an unlawful
practice under KRS 367.170. The Attorney General may enforce Sections 1 to 8
of this Act by bringing an action in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky
or on behalf of persons residing in this Commonwealth. The Attorney General
shall have all powers and duties granted under KRS Chapter 15 to investigate and
prosecute any violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act. The Attorney General may
demand any information, documentary material, or physical evidence from any
covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform believed to be
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 873
engaged in, or about to engage in, any violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
(2) Prior to initiating any action for violation of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, the
Attorney General shall provide a covered AI companion platform or covered
social media platform thirty (30) days written notice identifying the specific
provisions of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, the Attorney General alleges have been
violated. If the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform
cures the noticed violation within thirty (30) days and provides the Attorney
General an express written statement that the alleged violations have been cured
and that no further violations will occur, an action for damages shall not be
initiated against the controller or processor.
(3) If the covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform continues
to violate Sections 1 to 8 of this Act following the cure period or breaches an
express written statement provided to the Attorney General under the subsection
(2) of this section, the Attorney General may initiate a civil action and seek
damages for up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each continued violation.
(4) Any covered AI companion platform or covered social media platform that
intentionally or recklessly violates Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall be assessed a
civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense in
addition to the damages in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses incurred in investigating
and preparing the case, court costs, attorney's fees, and any other relief ordered
by the court in any action initiated under Sections 1 to 8 of this Act.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed